Maryland, session 2026, HB1458.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF MARYLAND,
That the Laws of Maryland read as follows:
Article – Human Services
5–507.
(A) (1) IN THIS SECTION THE FOLLOWING WORDS HAVE THE MEANINGS
INDICATED.
(2) “PROGRAM” MEANS THE STATE SUPPLEMENTAL NUTRITION
ASSISTANCE PROGRAM FOR REFUGEES AND ASYLEES.
EXPLANATION: CAPITALS INDICATE MATTER ADDED TO EXISTING LAW.
[Brackets] indicate matter deleted from exist in g l aw . *hb1458*

HOUSE BILL 1458
(3) “REFUGEE” MEANS:
(I) AN INDIVIDUAL WHO IS NOT A UNITED STATES CITIZEN;
(II) AN INDIVIDUAL WHO HAS BEEN IN THE UNITED STATES FOR
60 MONTHS OR LESS; AND
(III) AN INDIVIDUAL WHO IS ANY OF THE FOLLOWING:
1. A REFUGEE ADMITTED UNDER 8 U.S.C. § 1157;
2. AN ASYLEE ADMITTED UNDER 8 U.S.C. § 1158;
3. A CUBAN OR HAITIAN ENTRANT AS DEFINED IN 45
C.F.R. § 401.2;
4. AN INDIVIDUAL GRANTED WITHHOLDING OF
REMOVAL UNDER 8 U.S.C. § 1231(B)(3) OR PROTECTION UNDER THE CONVENTION
AGAINST TORTURE;
5. A PAROLEE WHO HAS BEEN DESIGNATED BY FEDERAL
LAW AS ELIGIBLE FOR REFUGEE RESETTLEMENT SERVICES, INCLUDING:
A. AFGHAN HUMANITARIAN PAROLEES ADMITTED
UNDER THE AFGHANISTAN SUPPLEMENTAL APPROPRIATIONS ACT OF 2022 AND
RELATED STATUTES;
B. UKRAINIAN HUMANITARIAN PAROLEES ADMITTED
UNDER THE UKRAINE SUPPLEMENTAL APPROPRIATIONS ACT OF 2022;
C. LAUTENBERG PAROLEES; AND
D. ANY OTHER PAROLEE CATEGORY THAT CONGRESS OR
THE OFFICE OF REFUGEE RESETTLEMENT DESIGNATES AS ELIGIBLE FOR REFUGEE
BENEFITS;
6. AN AMERASIAN IMMIGRANT LAWFULLY ADMITTED TO
THE UNITED STATES WHO IS DESCRIBED IN 8 U.S.C. § 1612(A)(2)(A)(V);
7. A VICTIM OF A SEVERE FORM OF TRAFFICKING IN
PERSONS AND THE VICTIM’S FAMILY MEMBERS WHO ARE ELIGIBLE FOR BENEFITS
AND SERVICES FROM FEDERAL AND STATE PROGRAMS UNDER 22 U.S.C. §
7105(B)(1)(A);

HOUSE BILL 1458 3
8. AN IRAQI OR AFGHAN NATIONAL GRANTED SPECIAL
IMMIGRANT STATUS, INCLUDING:
A. AN IRAQI GRANTED A SPECIAL IMMIGRANT VISA
UNDER SECTION 1059 OF THE NATIONAL DEFENSE AUTHORIZATION ACT FOR
FISCAL YEAR 2006;
B. AN AFGHAN GRANTED A SPECIAL IMMIGRANT VISA
UNDER SECTION 602(B) OF THE AFGHAN ALLIES PROTECTION ACT OF 2009; AND
C. SPOUSES AND CHILDREN GRANTED DERIVATIVE
SPECIAL IMMIGRANT STATUS; AND
9. ANY OTHER NONCITIZEN POPULATION THAT THE
OFFICE OF REFUGEE RESETTLEMENT DETERMINES TO BE ELIGIBLE FOR REFUGEE
RESETTLEMENT SERVICES UNDER THE REFUGEE ACT OF 1980.
(4) “SUPPLEMENTAL NUTRITION ASSISTANCE PROGRAM” MEANS
THE SUPPLEMENTAL NUTRITION ASSISTANCE PROGRAM ESTABLISHED IN
ACCORDANCE WITH § 5–501 OF THIS SUBTITLE.
(B) (1) THERE IS A STATE SUPPLEMENTAL NUTRITION ASSISTANCE
PROGRAM FOR REFUGEES AND ASYLEES.
(2) THE DEPARTMENT SHALL ADMINISTER THE PROGRAM.
(3) THE PURPOSE OF THE PROGRAM IS TO EXPAND FOOD ACCESS TO
HOUSEHOLDS UNDER THE ELIGIBILITY REQUIREMENTS FOR SUPPLEMENTAL
NUTRITION ASSISTANCE PROGRAM BENEFITS IN EFFECT ON JULY 3, 2025.
(C) A HOUSEHOLD IS ELIGIBLE TO PARTICIPATE IN THE PROGRAM IF THE
HOUSEHOLD INCLUDES AN INDIVIDUAL WHO:
(1) WAS ELIGIBLE TO RECEIVE SUPPLEMENTAL NUTRITION
ASSISTANCE PROGRAM BENEFITS UNDER STATE AND FEDERAL LAW ON JULY 3,
2025;
(2) IS NOT ELIGIBLE TO RECEIVE SUPPLEMENTAL NUTRITION
ASSISTANCE PROGRAM BENEFITS AFTER JULY 3, 2025; AND
(3) IS:

HOUSE BILL 1458
(I) A REFUGEE;
(II) A LAWFUL PERMANENT RESIDENT WHO SATISFIED THE
RESIDENT REQUIREMENTS IN EFFECT ON JULY 3, 2025;
(III) A NONCITIZEN LAWFULLY PRESENT IN THE UNITED STATES
PREVIOUSLY ELIGIBLE FOR THE SUPPLEMENTAL NUTRITION ASSISTANCE
PROGRAM UNDER THE “QUALIFIED ALIEN” FRAMEWORK UNDER THE PERSONAL
RESPONSIBILITY AND WORK OPPORTUNITY RECONCILIATION ACT OF 1996;
(IV) A PAROLEE ELIGIBLE FOR THE SUPPLEMENTAL NUTRITION
ASSISTANCE PROGRAM ON JULY 3, 2025, INCLUDING AN INDIVIDUAL PAROLED
INTO THE UNITED STATES UNDER SECTION 212(D)(5) OF THE IMMIGRATION AND
NATIONALITY ACT WHO MET THE RESIDENCY OR EXEMPTION REQUIREMENTS IN
EFFECT ON JULY 3, 2025;
(V) A NONCITIZEN WITH WORK AUTHORIZATION WHO MET THE
ELIGIBILITY CRITERIA IN EFFECT ON JULY 3, 2025;
(VI) A NONCITIZEN ELIGIBLE UNDER MILITARY–RELATED OR
DISABILITY–RELATED EXEMPTIONS UNDER THE PERSONAL RESPONSIBILITY AND
WORK OPPORTUNITY RECONCILIATION ACT OF 1996 ON JULY 3, 2025; OR
(VII) A MEMBER OF ANY OTHER NONCITIZEN POPULATION
ELIGIBLE FOR SUPPLEMENTAL NUTRITION ASSISTANCE PROGRAM BENEFITS
UNDER FEDERAL LAW ON JULY 3, 2025.
(D) A HOUSEHOLD THAT INCLUDES AN INDIVIDUAL IDENTIFIED UNDER
SUBSECTION (C) OF THIS SECTION IS ELIGIBLE TO RECEIVE A BENEFIT UNDER THE
SUPPLEMENTAL NUTRITION ASSISTANCE PROGRAM UNDER ELIGIBILITY
REQUIREMENTS FOR THE PROGRAM IN EFFECT ON JULY 3, 2025.
(E) THE DEPARTMENT SHALL ADOPT REGULATIONS TO:
(1) VERIFY HOUSEHOLD ELIGIBILITY FOR PARTICIPATION IN THE
PROGRAM; AND
(2) CARRY OUT THIS SECTION.
SECTION 2. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That this Act shall take effect July
1, 2026.